Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2393.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 145A.02, subdivision 15, is amended to read: Subd. 15. Medical consultant. "Medical consultant" means new text begin an individual who:new text end new text begin (1) is licensed in Minnesota by the Board of Medical Practice as new text end a physician deleted text begin licensed to practice medicine in Minnesota whodeleted text end new text begin , doctor of osteopathic medicine, or physician assistant or is licensed in Minnesota by the Board of Nursing as an advanced practice registered nurse and is certified to practice as a clinical nurse specialist or nurse practitioner by a national nurse certification organization acceptable to the board; andnew text end new text begin (2)new text end is working under a written agreement with, employed by, or on contract with a community health board to provide advice and information, to authorize medical procedures through protocols, and to assist a community health board and its staff in coordinating their activities with local medical practitioners and health care institutions.